Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 631, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 201, O.S.L. 2023, and as renumbered by
Section 5, Chapter 201, O.S.L. 2023 (43A O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 2-
312.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-312.1. A. There is hereby created in the State
Treasury a revolving fund for the Department of Mental Health and
Substance Abuse Services to be designated the “County Community
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1647 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Safe ty Investment Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not
subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies
appropriated to the fund under Section 633 2-312.3 of this title.
B. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund shall be
budgeted and expended by the Department of Mental Health and
Substance Abuse Services for the sole purpose exclusive purposes of
providing:
1. Providing funds to counties for development and
implementation of the programs listed in Section 4 of this act
Section 2-312.4 of this title; and
2. Awarding funds to the Oklahoma Indigent Defense System Board
as provided in subsection F of Section 2-312.4 of this title to
support the programs described in such subsection.
C. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon warrants
issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by
law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 4, Chapter 201, O.S.L.
2023, as amended by Section 1, Chapter 230, O.S.L. 2025 (43A O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 2-312.4), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-312.4. A. Subject to availability of funds under
Section 2-312.1 of this title, the Department of Mental Health and
Substance Abuse Services shall annually issue a request for
proposals by which county governments or multi-county partnerships
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1647 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

may apply for funds for the development and implementation of
evidence-based:
1. Mental health and substance abuse treatment programs or
other health care programs provided in the community;
2. Pretrial diversion programs, mental health and substance use
jail intake screenings, or jail reentry programs;
3. Employment programs;
4. 3. Education programs; or
5. 4. Housing programs.
B. The request for proposals shall include, but not be limited
to, the proposed services or programs, number of individuals to be
served by the proposed services or programs, and the manner in which
the services or programs will partner with or be supported by local
Department-contracted or -certified entities.
C. For a proposal to be considered, the applying county
government or multi-county partnership must shall submit all
necessary documents to meet the requirements outlined in the request
for proposals.
D. The number of awards and funding amounts of each award shall
be at the discretion of the Department and shall be based on total
available funds, total county population, and the criteria in
subsection B of this section. Each county government or multi-
county partnership shall be allocated at least half one-half of one
percent (0.5%) of the total amount appropriated for the award cycle.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1647 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

E. The Department shall electronically submit an annual report
to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives that includes the amount awarded to each
county government or multi-county partnership and a summary of
services provided by each county government or multi-county
partnership.
F. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
Department may annually award not more than One Million Dollars
($1,000,000.00) from the County Community Safety Investment Fund
created in Section 2-312.1 of this title to the Oklahoma Indigent
Defense System Board for the purpose of supporting the development
and implementation of evidence-based pretrial diversion programs,
mental health and substance use jail intake screenings, jail reentry
programs, or any combination thereof. The Oklahoma Indigent Defense
System Board shall:
1. Use the awarded funds for the sole purpose provided in this
subsection; and
2. Annually compile and electronically submit a report to the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, and the Governor that details the expenses and
programs described in this subsection and includes statistical data
on clients and outcomes.
G. The Board of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1647 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

and Sections 2-312.1, 2-312.2, and 2-312.3 of this title including,
but not limited to, rules that set qualifications for programs
eligible to receive funds under this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
February 9, 2026 - DO PASS















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1647 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)